Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 3. Ballast Water Discharge

§ 28.2-109.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Ballast water”
means any water or matter taken on board a vessel to control or maintain trim, draft, stability or stresses of the vessel, without regard to the manner in which it is carried.

“Commercial vessel”
means a self-propelled ship in commerce of 300 gross tons or more. The term “commercial vessel” does not include a vessel of the United States Department of Defense or United States Coast Guard subject to the requirements of § 1103 of the National Invasive Species Act of 1996, or any vessel of the Armed Forces, as defined in 33 U.S.C. § 1322(a)(14), that is subject to the uniform national discharge standards for vessels of the Armed Forces under 33 U.S.C. § 1322(n).

“Federal guidelines”
means the provisions of 33 C.F.R. Part 151, Subpart D, “Ballast Water Management for Control of Nonindigenous Species in Waters of the United States.”

“Operator”
means any person who owns, operates, charters, rents or otherwise exercises control over or responsibility for a vessel.

History.

2001, c. 312.

§ 28.2-110.
Filing requirements; penalty.

The operator, or a ship agent acting on behalf of the operator, of a commercial vessel that enters into Virginia waters shall file a Ballast Water Control Report form with the Virginia Maritime Association as the designated agent of the Commission (i) within seventy-two hours of the completion of the discharge of ballast water if the commercial vessel discharges ballast water into Virginia waters, or (ii) prior to the commercial vessel’s departure from Virginia waters if the commercial vessel does not discharge ballast water into Virginia waters. The operator, or ship agent of an operator, shall not be required to file a Ballast Water Control Report form if the commercial vessel’s previous port-of-call is located within the United States Exclusive Economic Zone and a ballast water control report was previously filed upon entering the first port-of-call within the United States Exclusive Economic Zone. A Ballast Water Control Report form shall be deemed to have been filed when it is hand delivered to the Virginia Maritime Association, sent by electronic mail or facsimile transmission and received by the Virginia Maritime Association, or sent to the Virginia Maritime Association by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested. The services of the Virginia Maritime Association shall be provided at no cost to the Commission. The fees assessed by the Virginia Maritime Association shall only be that amount necessary to cover the expenses for the reporting services provided to vessel operators and any associated recordkeeping related to the ballast water reporting requirements of this article. If in the judgment of the Commission or the Virginia Maritime Association, the Virginia Maritime Association is unable to satisfactorily perform its responsibilities, the Commission may (i) select another agent, provided proper notice of the change in the designated agent has been given to operators, or (ii) assume responsibility for carrying out the provisions of this section.

For commercial vessels whose point of origin is located outside the United States Exclusive Economic Zone and whose first port of call within the United States Exclusive Economic Zone is within Virginia waters, the filing of a copy of the completed form submitted by the operator to the National Ballast Water Information Clearinghouse of the Smithsonian Environmental Research Center with the Virginia Maritime Association shall be deemed compliance with the reporting requirements of this section.

Any operator of a commercial vessel who knowingly fails to file a Ballast Water Control Report form with the Virginia Maritime Association within the applicable time period set forth in subsection A, or who knowingly makes any false statement in a Ballast Water Control Report form submitted to the Virginia Maritime Association, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2001, c. 312; 2002, c. 40; 2010, c. 815.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 40, in subsection A, inserted “Hampton Roads Maritime Association as the designated agent of the” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, substituted “previous port-of-call” for “point of origin” and inserted “and a ballast water control report was previously filed upon entering the first port-of-call within the United States Economic Zone” to the end, substituted “Hampton Roads Maritime Association” for “Commission” in three places in the former last sentence, and added the present last three sentences; and substituted “Hampton Roads Maritime Association” for “Commission” in subsection B and twice in subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 815 substituted “Virginia Maritime Association” for “Hampton Roads Maritime Association” throughout.

§ 28.2-111.
Adoption of guidelines and forms.

The Commission shall adopt the federal guidelines as the guidelines governing voluntary ballast water management practices to be followed by the operators of commercial vessels. The guidelines adopted by the Commission shall not require a commercial vessel to be operated in a manner that may threaten the safety of the commercial vessel, its crew or its passengers.

The Commission shall adopt Ballast Water Control Report forms, consistent with the form adopted by the United States Coast Guard and set forth in 33 C.F.R. Part 151, Subpart D, Appendix, to monitor compliance with the guidelines adopted pursuant to this section. The Commission shall adopt procedures to distribute the Ballast Water Control Report form to the operator of a commercial vessel, or to a ship agent for the operator, at the time the commercial vessel enters state waters or as soon thereafter as practicable.

The Commission shall submit copies of the forms received from operators of commercial vessels and ship agents acting on behalf of operators of commercial vessels with the National Ballast Water Information Clearinghouse of the Smithsonian Environmental Research Center on a quarterly basis. The Virginia Maritime Association shall submit such forms to the Commission monthly.

History.

2001, c. 312; 2002, c. 40; 2010, c. 815.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 40 added the present last sentence in subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 815 substituted “Virginia” for “Hampton Roads” in subsection C.